br_FR.aff
FLAG long
# Verboù dre -iañ 
# glebiañ : gleb- 
SFX d4 Y 52 
SFX d4 0 0 . is:imp_p2_sg
SFX d4 0 0 . is:pri_p3_sg
SFX d4 0 fe . is:cni_p3_sg
SFX d4 0 fec'h . is:cni_p2_pl
SFX d4 0 fed . is:cni_impers_sp
SFX d4 0 femp . is:cni_p1_pl
SFX d4 0 fen . is:cni_p1_sg
SFX d4 0 fent . is:cni_p3_pl
SFX d4 0 fes . is:cni_p2_sg
SFX d4 0 i . is:fti_p2_sg
SFX d4 0 ian . is:pri_p1_sg
SFX d4 0 ias . is:past_p3_sg
SFX d4 0 ie . is:pii_p3_sg
SFX d4 0 iec'h . is:pii_p2_pl
SFX d4 0 ied . is:pii_impers_sp
SFX d4 0 iemp . is:pii_p1_pl
SFX d4 0 ien . is:pii_p1_sg
SFX d4 0 ient . is:imp_p3_pl
SFX d4 0 ient . is:pii_p3_pl
SFX d4 0 ier . is:pri_impers_sp
SFX d4 0 ies . is:pii_p2_sg
SFX d4 0 iet . is:imp_p3_sg
SFX d4 0 iet . is:pp
SFX d4 0 ietañ . is:sup
SFX d4 0 ietoc'h . is:comp
SFX d4 0 iez . is:pri_p2_sg
SFX d4 0 imp . is:fti_p1_pl
SFX d4 0 in . is:fti_p1_sg
SFX d4 0 int . is:fti_p3_pl
SFX d4 0 io . is:fti_p3_sg
SFX d4 0 ioc'h . is:fti_p2_pl
SFX d4 0 iomp . is:imp_p1_pl
SFX d4 0 iomp . is:pri_p1_pl
SFX d4 0 iont . is:pri_p3_pl
SFX d4 0 ior . is:fti_impers_sp
SFX d4 0 iot . is:fti_p2_pl
SFX d4 0 is . is:past_p1_sg
SFX d4 0 it . is:imp_p2_pl
SFX d4 0 it . is:pri_p2_pl
SFX d4 0 je . is:cip_p3_sg
SFX d4 0 jec'h . is:cip_p2_pl
SFX d4 0 jed . is:cip_impers_sp
SFX d4 0 jemp . is:cip_p1_pl
SFX d4 0 jen . is:cip_p1_sg
SFX d4 0 jent . is:cip_p3_pl
SFX d4 0 jes . is:cip_p2_sg
SFX d4 0 joc'h . is:past_p2_pl
SFX d4 0 jod . is:past_impers_sp
SFX d4 0 jomp . is:past_p1_pl
SFX d4 0 jon . is:past_p1_sg
SFX d4 0 jont . is:past_p3_pl
SFX d4 0 jout . is:past_p2_sg
 
# Verboù dre -liañ 
# kuzuliañ : kuzuilh- 
SFX d5 Y 52 
SFX d5 0 0 . is:pri_p3_sg
SFX d5 0 0 . is:imp_p2_sg
SFX d5 0 fe . is:cni_p3_sg
SFX d5 0 fec'h . is:cni_p2_pl
SFX d5 0 fed . is:cni_impers_sp
SFX d5 0 femp . is:cni_p1_pl
SFX d5 0 fen . is:cni_p1_sg
SFX d5 0 fent . is:cni_p3_pl
SFX d5 0 fes . is:cni_p2_sg
SFX d5 0 i . is:fti_p2_sg
SFX d5 0 imp . is:fti_p1_pl
SFX d5 0 in . is:fti_p1_sg
SFX d5 0 int . is:fti_p3_pl
SFX d5 0 is . is:past_p1_sg
SFX d5 0 it . is:pri_p2_pl
SFX d5 0 it . is:imp_p2_pl
SFX d5 0 je . is:cip_p3_sg
SFX d5 0 jec'h . is:cip_p2_pl
SFX d5 0 jed . is:cip_impers_sp
SFX d5 0 jemp . is:cip_p1_pl
SFX d5 0 jen . is:cip_p1_sg
SFX d5 0 jent . is:cip_p3_pl
SFX d5 0 jes . is:cip_p2_sg
SFX d5 0 joc'h . is:past_p2_pl
SFX d5 0 jod . is:past_impers_sp
SFX d5 0 jomp . is:past_p1_pl
SFX d5 0 jon . is:past_p1_sg
SFX d5 0 jont . is:past_p3_pl
SFX d5 0 jout . is:past_p2_sg
SFX d5 ilh lian . is:pri_p1_sg
SFX d5 ilh lias . is:past_p3_sg
SFX d5 ilh lie . is:pii_p3_sg
SFX d5 ilh liec'h . is:pii_p2_pl
SFX d5 ilh lied . is:pii_impers_sp
SFX d5 ilh liemp . is:pii_p1_pl
SFX d5 ilh lien . is:pii_p1_sg
SFX d5 ilh lient . is:pii_p3_pl
SFX d5 ilh lient . is:imp_p3_pl
SFX d5 ilh lier . is:pri_impers_sp
SFX d5 ilh lies . is:pii_p2_sg
SFX d5 ilh liet . is:pp
SFX d5 ilh liet . is:imp_p3_sg
SFX d5 ilh lietañ . is:sup
SFX d5 ilh lietoc'h . is:comp
SFX d5 ilh liez . is:pri_p2_sg
SFX d5 ilh lio . is:fti_p3_sg
SFX d5 ilh lioc'h . is:fti_p2_pl
SFX d5 ilh liomp . is:pri_p1_pl
SFX d5 ilh liomp . is:imp_p1_pl
SFX d5 ilh liont . is:pri_p3_pl
SFX d5 ilh lior . is:fti_impers_sp
SFX d5 ilh liot . is:fti_p2_pl
 
# Verboù dre -niañ 
# koaniañ : koagn- 
SFX d6 Y 52 
SFX d6 0 0 . is:imp_p2_sg 
SFX d6 0 0 . is:pri_p3_sg 
SFX d6 0 fe . is:cni_p3_sg 
SFX d6 0 fec'h . is:cni_p2_pl 
SFX d6 0 fed . is:cni_impers_sp 
SFX d6 0 femp . is:cni_p1_pl 
SFX d6 0 fen . is:cni_p1_sg 
SFX d6 0 fent . is:cni_p3_pl 
SFX d6 0 fes . is:cni_p2_sg 
SFX d6 0 i . is:fti_p2_sg 
SFX d6 0 imp . is:fti_p1_pl 
SFX d6 0 in . is:fti_p1_sg 
SFX d6 0 int . is:fti_p3_pl 
SFX d6 0 is . is:past_p1_sg 
SFX d6 0 it . is:imp_p2_pl 
SFX d6 0 it . is:pri_p2_pl 
SFX d6 0 je . is:cip_p3_sg 
SFX d6 0 jec'h . is:cip_p2_pl 
SFX d6 0 jed . is:cip_impers_sp 
SFX d6 0 jemp . is:cip_p1_pl 
SFX d6 0 jen . is:cip_p1_sg 
SFX d6 0 jent . is:cip_p3_pl 
SFX d6 0 jes . is:cip_p2_sg 
SFX d6 0 joc'h . is:past_p2_pl 
SFX d6 0 jod . is:past_impers_sp 
SFX d6 0 jomp . is:past_p1_pl 
SFX d6 0 jon . is:past_p1_sg 
SFX d6 0 jont . is:past_p3_pl 
SFX d6 0 jout . is:past_p2_sg 
SFX d6 gn nian . is:pri_p1_sg 
SFX d6 gn nias . is:past_p3_sg 
SFX d6 gn nie . is:pii_p3_sg 
SFX d6 gn niec'h . is:pii_p2_pl 
SFX d6 gn nied . is:pii_impers_sp 
SFX d6 gn niemp . is:pii_p1_pl 
SFX d6 gn nien . is:pii_p1_sg 
SFX d6 gn nient . is:imp_p3_pl 
SFX d6 gn nient . is:pii_p3_pl 
SFX d6 gn nier . is:pri_impers_sp 
SFX d6 gn nies . is:pii_p2_sg 
SFX d6 gn niet . is:imp_p3_sg 
SFX d6 gn niet . is:pp 
SFX d6 gn nietañ . is:sup 
SFX d6 gn nietoc'h . is:comp 
SFX d6 gn niez . is:pri_p2_sg 
SFX d6 gn nio . is:fti_p3_sg 
SFX d6 gn nioc'h . is:fti_p2_pl 
SFX d6 gn niomp . is:imp_p1_pl 
SFX d6 gn niomp . is:pri_p1_pl 
SFX d6 gn niont . is:pri_p3_pl 
SFX d6 gn nior . is:fti_impers_sp 
SFX d6 gn niot . is:fti_p2_pl 

# Displegadurioù : ober  
SFX d7 Y 54  
SFX d7 0 0 . is:pri_p3_sg
SFX d7 0 0 . is:imp_p2_sg
SFX d7 0 e . is:pii_p3_sg
SFX d7 0 ec'h . is:pii_p2_pl
SFX d7 0 ed . is:pii_impers_sp
SFX d7 0 emp . is:pii_p1_pl
SFX d7 0 en . is:pii_p1_sg
SFX d7 0 ent . is:pii_p3_pl
SFX d7 0 ent . is:imp_p3_pl
SFX d7 0 es . is:pii_p2_sg
SFX d7 0 et . is:imp_p3_sg
SFX d7 0 et . is:pp
SFX d7 0 etañ . is:sup
SFX d7 0 etoc'h . is:comp
SFX d7 0 fe . is:cni_p3_sg
SFX d7 0 fec'h . is:cni_p2_pl
SFX d7 0 fed . is:cni_impers_sp
SFX d7 0 femp . is:cni_p1_pl
SFX d7 0 fen . is:cni_p1_sg
SFX d7 0 fent . is:cni_p3_pl
SFX d7 0 fes . is:cni_p2_sg
SFX d7 0 imp . is:fti_p1_pl
SFX d7 0 int . is:fti_p3_pl
SFX d7 0 io . is:fti_p3_sg
SFX d7 0 je . is:cip_p3_sg
SFX d7 0 jec'h . is:cip_p2_pl
SFX d7 0 jed . is:cip_impers_sp
SFX d7 0 jemp . is:cip_p1_pl
SFX d7 0 jen . is:cip_p1_sg
SFX d7 0 jent . is:cip_p3_pl
SFX d7 0 jes . is:cip_p2_sg
SFX d7 0 n . is:pri_p1_sg
SFX d7 0 y . is:fti_p3_sg
SFX d7 a eas . is:past_p3_sg
SFX d7 a eer . is:pri_impers_sp
SFX d7 a ejoc'h . is:past_p2_pl
SFX d7 a ejod . is:past_impers_sp
SFX d7 a ejomp . is:past_p1_pl
SFX d7 a ejon . is:past_p1_sg
SFX d7 a ejont . is:past_p3_pl
SFX d7 a ejout . is:past_p2_sg
SFX d7 a eoc'h . is:fti_p2_pl
SFX d7 a eomp . is:pri_p1_pl
SFX d7 a eomp . is:imp_p1_pl
SFX d7 a eont . is:pri_p3_pl
SFX d7 a eor . is:fti_impers_sp
SFX d7 a eot . is:fti_p2_pl
SFX d7 a ez . is:pri_p2_sg
SFX d7 a i . is:fti_p2_sg
SFX d7 a imp . is:fti_p1_pl
SFX d7 a in . is:fti_p1_sg
SFX d7 a is . is:past_p1_sg
SFX d7 a it . is:pri_p2_pl
SFX d7 a it . is:imp_p2_pl
